West Virginia, session 2025, HB2859.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. Menstrual product labeling. §47-29-1. Definitions. For purposes of this section:"Ingredient" means an intentionally added substance present in the menstrual product;"Menstrual product" means products used for the purpose of catching menstruation and vaginal discharge, including, but not limited to, tampons, pads, and menstrual cups.  These products may be either disposable or reusable. §47-29-2. Plain and conspicuous list of ingredients. No later than 18 months after the effective date of this article, each package or box containing menstrual products sold in this state shall contain a plain and conspicuous printed list of all ingredients which shall be listed in order of predominance.  The list shall either be printed on the package or affixed thereto. §47-29-3. Labeling requirement in addition to other regulations. The requirements of this article apply in addition to any other labeling requirements established pursuant to any other provision of law. §47-29-4. Civil penalty. Whenever a violation of this section has occurred, a civil penalty of one percent of the manufacturer's total annual in-state sales not to exceed $5 per package or box shall be imposed on the manufacturer.